California, session 20252026, AB884.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 85322 is added to the Government Code, to read:85322. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, an investor-owned utility shall not make a contribution to a candidate for elective state office.(b) A candidate for elective state office shall not accept a contribution from an investor-owned utility.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.